Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.943, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Exemptions. (a) This section does not apply to: (1) a product for which federal law governs the presence of PFAS in the product in a manner that preempts state authority; (2) a product regulated under section 325F.072 or 325F.075; or (3) the sale or resale of a used product. (b) Subdivisions 4 and 5 do not apply to a prosthetic or orthotic device or to any product that is a medical device or drug or that is otherwise used in a medical setting or in medical applications regulated by the United States Food and Drug Administration. new text begin (c) An electronic or internal component of a product is exempt from the prohibitions under subdivision 5 until January 1, 2032. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end